Massachusetts, session 194th, H3116.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of section 2 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 
subparagraph:- 
(R) Any amount received by a veteran who is permanently and totally disabled that 
would be includible in gross income for such taxable year by reason of the discharge of an 
educational loan under section 108(f)(5)(A)(iii) of the Code.